Georgia, session 2025_26, SB348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating a Board of County Commissioners of Hancock County, approved
October 5, 1885 (Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 435), as amended, particularly by an Act approved
May 6, 2013 (Ga. L. 2013, p. 4328), is amended by revising subsections (b) and (c) of
Section II as follows:
"(b) For the purpose of electing members of the board other than the chairperson, Hancock
County shall be divided into four commissioner districts. Commissioner Districts 1, 2, 3,
and 4 shall be and correspond to those four numbered districts described in Appendix A
attached to and made a part of this Act and further identified as 'User: SD26 Plan Name:
S. B. 348
- 1 -

LC 47 3592
HancockCCSB-2025 Plan Type: Local'. The chairperson shall be elected by the electors
of the entire county.
(c)(1) For the purposes of such plan:
(A) The term 'VTD' shall mean and describe the same geographical boundaries as
provided in the report of the Bureau of the Census for the United States decennial
census of 2020 for the State of Georgia. The separate numeric designations in a district
description which are underneath a VTD heading shall mean and describe individual
Blocks within a VTD as provided in the report of the Bureau of the Census for the
United States decennial census of 2020 for the State of Georgia; and
(B) Except as otherwise provided in the description of any district, whenever the
description of any district refers to a named city, it shall mean the geographical
boundaries of that city as shown on the census maps for the United States decennial
census of 2020 for the State of Georgia.
(2) Any part of Hancock County which is not included in any district described in
subsection (b) of this section shall be included within that district contiguous to such part
which contains the least population according to the United States decennial census
of 2020 for the State of Georgia.
(3) Any part of Hancock County which is described in subsection (b) of this section as
being included in a particular district shall nevertheless not be included within such
district if such part is not contiguous to such district. Such noncontiguous part shall
instead be included within that district contiguous to such part which contains the least
population according to the United States decennial census of 2020 for the State of
Georgia."
SECTION 2.
(a) Those members of the Board of County Commissioners of Hancock County who are
serving as such on the effective date of this Act and any person selected to fill a vacancy in
S. B. 348
- 2 -

LC 47 3592
any such office shall continue to serve as such members until the regular expiration of their
respective terms of office and upon the election and qualification of their respective
successors.
(b) Commissioner Districts 1, 2, 3, and 4, as they exist immediately prior to the effective
date of this Act, shall continue to be designated as Commissioner Districts 1, 2, 3, and 4,
respectively, but as newly described under this Act, and on and after the effective date of this
Act, such members of the board serving from those former commissioner districts shall be
deemed to be serving from and representing their respective districts as newly described
under this Act.
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 348
- 3 -

LC 47 3592
APPENDIX A
User: SD26
Plan Name: HancockCCSB-2025
Plan Type: Local
District 001
County Hancock GA
VTD DEVEREUX FIRE STATION
Block 480300
1006 1008 1009 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1031 1032
1033 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1052 1053
1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065
1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077
1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1090
1091 1092 1093 1094 1095 1096 1097 1098 1099 1100 1103 1104
1105 1112 1113 1114 1115 1116 1124 1125 1126 1140 1141 1142
1143 1145 1146 1147 1149 1150 1151 1154 1155 1156 1157 1173
1178 1179
VTD SECOND BEULAH
Block 480300
1122 1123
Block 480400
5018 5019 5026 5027 5045 5046
VTD ST. MARK
S. B. 348
- 4 -

LC 47 3592
District 002
County Hancock GA
VTD COURTHOUSE
Block 480400
2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2065 2066 2067 2068
2069 2071 2077 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3008
3009 3012 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 4089 4090 4091
5000 5001 5002 5023
VTD DEVEREUX FIRE STATION
Block 480300
1089 1101 1102 1106 1107 1108 1109 1110 1111 1175 1176 1177
VTD SECOND BEULAH
Block 480300
1117 1118 1119 1120 1121 1127 1128 1129 1130 1131 1132 1133
1134 1135 1136 1137 1138 1139 1144 1148 1152 1153 1158 1159
1160 1161 1162 1163 1164 1165 1166 1167 1168 1169 1170 1171
1172 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2012 2013 2015 2016
2017 2024
Block 480400
1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1027 1043 1051
1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1091 1092 3021
100 3022 3023 5006 5022 5024 5025 5028 5029 5032 5033 5034 5035
101 5036 5037 5038 5039 5041 5042 5043 5044 5047 5052 5053 5055
102 District 003
103 County Hancock GA
104 VTD DEVEREUX FIRE STATION
S. B. 348
- 5 -

LC 47 3592
105 Block 480300
106 1004 1005 1010 1011 1012 1013 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039
107 1049 1050 1051 1174
108 VTD MAYFIELD COMMUNITY CENTER
109 VTD POWER OF GOD
110 VTD WARREN CHAPEL
111 District 004
112 County Hancock GA
113 VTD COURTHOUSE
114 Block 480400
115 2053 2054 2055 2056 2062 2063 2064 2070 2072 2073 2074 2075
116 2076 2078 2079
117 VTD SECOND DARRIEN
118 VTD SPARTA 4C
119 VTD YOUTH CENTER
120 Block 480300
121 2000
122 Block 480400
123 1000 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012
124 1013 1014 1015 1025 1026 1028 1029 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035
125 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048
126 1049 1050 1061 1062 1063 1068 1069 1071 1072 1073 1078 1093
127 1094 2094 3010 3011 3013 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030
128 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040
S. B. 348
- 6 -